District of Columbia statutes.
47-895.24

Application of assessment.

The Chief Financial Officer shall deposit the special assessment revenues collected under this subchapter in the Waterfront Park Maintenance Fund established by § 10-1803.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-105, § 7(b), 57 DCR 11